Illinois, session 104th, HB841.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Small Business Job Creation Tax Credit Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 25/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Small 8Business Job Creation Tax Credit Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-888, eff. 4-13-10.)